California statutes. Public Contract Code
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, contracts awarded by any state agency, department, officer, or other state governmental entity for the purchase of general public advertisements shall have statewide participation goals of not less than 15 percent for minority business enterprises, not less than five percent for women business enterprises, and three percent for disabled veteran business enterprises. These goals apply to the overall dollar amount expended each year by the awarding state agency, department, offices, or other state governmental
 entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1034, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10115.15.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10115.2, when awarding contracts for materials, supplies, or equipment, including electronic data processing goods and services, an awarding department shall accept the submission by a bidder of a minority, women, and disabled veteran business enterprise utilization plan that has been approved prior to the solicitation due date by the Department of General Services. A business utilization plan shall be considered approved by the Department of General Services as of the date submitted to the department so long
 as the plan meets the minimum criteria established in paragraphs (1) to (12), inclusive, and shall be valid for a period of one year, unless the department has audited the utilization plan, as authorized under subdivision (b), and disapproves it for reasons specified under subdivision (c). The decision of whether to establish a minority, women, and disabled veteran business enterprise utilization plan shall be at the option of the vendor. If a bidder cites an approved utilization plan in response to the minority, women, and disabled veteran business enterprise participation requirements of a solicitation that calls for 15 percent minority-owned, 5 percent women-owned, and 3 percent disabled veteran-owned business participation, then that utilization plan shall be considered responsive to the participation goals of the solicitation document. If a solicitation specifies higher participation goals than those in the bidder’s utilization plan, the bidder shall meet the goals in the solicitation. At a minimum, the
 utilization plan shall include the following information:

(1) A statement of the vendor’s minority, women, and disabled veteran business enterprise utilization plan, including the primary objectives of the utilization plan.

(2) An explanation showing sufficient business reasons why the vendor did not meet minority, women, and disabled veteran business enterprise participation goals set forth in the vendor’s minority, women, and disabled veteran business utilization plan submitted to, and approved by, the Department of General Services in the previous year, if applicable. Further, if the vendor did not meet the minority, women, and disabled veteran business participation goals in the previous year, the vendor shall also identify remedial steps it will take to meet the goals in the current utilization plan.

(3) A
 statement of the vendor’s minority, women, and disabled veteran business utilization goals for the succeeding year. At a minimum, these utilization goals shall be equal to the statewide participation goals set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 10115.

(4) Estimated total dollars to be subcontracted by the vendor for sales within the United States for the succeeding year.

(5) Estimated total dollars to be subcontracted by the vendor for sales within the State of California for the succeeding year.

(6) Total dollars expressed as a percentage of the amount estimated pursuant to paragraph (4), intended to be subcontracted with each of the following:

(A) Minority business enterprises.

(B) Women business enterprises.

(7) Total dollars, expressed as a percentage of the amount estimated pursuant to paragraph (5), intended to be subcontracted with disabled veteran-owned business enterprises.

(8) A representative listing of the products and services that the vendor anticipates subcontracting, including an identification of the types of subcontracting planned for minority, women, and disabled veteran business enterprises.

(9) The name of the individual employed by the vendor who will administer the vendor’s utilization plan, including a description of the duties of the individual.

(10) A description of the efforts that the vendor will undertake to ensure that minority, women, and disabled veteran business enterprises will have
 an equitable opportunity to compete for contracts.

(11) A listing of the records and reports that the vendor will maintain to demonstrate the practices and procedures that have been adopted to comply with the requirements and goals of the utilization plan.

(12) Affirmation that the vendor met the statewide minority, women, and disabled veteran business enterprise utilization goals for the previous year, if applicable.

(b) The Department of General Services shall conduct random audits of the submitted utilization plans to determine compliance with this article, and shall retain on file all submitted utilization plans for auditing purposes. During any audit of a submitted utilization plan, the Department of General Services may ask a vendor to submit a list of all the minority, women, and disabled veteran business
 enterprises included as subcontractors in the vendor’s plan for the previous year. This information shall remain confidential. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the Department of General Services to audit all of the minority, women, and disabled veteran business enterprise utilization plans submitted by individual vendors. The Department of General Services may establish appropriate fees to cover the actual costs of conducting random audits and retaining on file all submitted plans.

(c) (1) At any time, the Department of General Services may disapprove a vendor’s minority, women, and disabled veteran business enterprise utilization plan for any of the following reasons:

(A) The utilization plan fails to evidence a vendor’s intention to comply fully with the statewide minority, women, and disabled veteran business enterprise goals for the
 succeeding year, as indicated by failure of the utilization plan to contain the information specified in subdivision (a).

(B) The utilization plan fails to evidence sufficient business reasons for failure to achieve the minority, women, and disabled veteran business enterprise goals set forth in a utilization plan submitted in the previous year, if applicable.

(C) The utilization plan fails to evidence sufficient remedial steps the vendor will take if the vendor did not meet the minority, women, and disabled veteran business participation goals in the previous year, if applicable.

(2) If a vendor’s utilization plan is disapproved, the vendor may not submit a new utilization plan to the department for a period of one year from the date of disapproval. Prior to disapproval of a vendor’s utilization plan, the vendor
 shall be entitled to a public hearing and to five days’ notice of the time and place thereof. The notice shall state the reasons for the hearing.

(3) A vendor that submits a minority, women, and disabled veteran business utilization plan that is approved by the Department of General Services, and that is subsequently awarded a contract to which the vendor would not otherwise have been entitled, and who fails to evidence intention to fully comply with the minority, women, and disabled veteran business enterprise goals in the utilization plan, or fails to evidence sufficient business reasons for failing to achieve the minority, women, and disabled veteran business enterprise goals set forth in the utilization plan, shall:

(A) Pay to the state any difference between the contract amount and what the state’s cost would have been if the contract had been properly awarded.

(B) In addition to the amount specified in subparagraph (A), be assessed a penalty in an amount of not more than 10 percent of the amount of the contract involved.

(C) Be ineligible to transact any business with the state for a period of not less than three months and not more than 24 months.

Prior to imposition of any sanction under this chapter, the contractor or vendor shall be entitled to a public hearing and to five days’ notice of the time and place thereof. The notice shall state the reasons for the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 19, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Plans and Specifications [10120. - 10129.]

10120.

Before entering into any contract for a project, the department shall prepare full, complete, and accurate plans and specifications and estimates of cost, giving such directions as will enable any competent mechanic or other builder to carry them out.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10121.

The original draft or a certified copy of the plans, specifications, and estimates of cost shall be filed permanently in the office of the department before further action is taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 857, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10122.

Work on all projects shall be done under contract awarded to the lowest responsible bidder pursuant to this part, except that it may be done by day’s labor under the direction of the department, by contract upon informal bids, or by a combination thereof:

(a) In case of emergency due to the failure or threat of failure of any bridge or other highway structure.

(b) In case of emergency due to the failure or threat of failure of any dam, reservoir, aqueduct, or other water facility or
 facility appurtenant thereto.

(c) In case of emergency due to damage to a state-owned building or any other state-owned real property or improvements located thereon, by an act of God, including but not limited to damage by storm, flood, fire or earthquake, for work and remedial measures which are required immediately.

(d) At any time after the approval of plans, specifications and estimates of cost, if the director deems the advertising or award of a contract, the acceptance of any bid, or the acceptance of any further bids after the rejection of all submitted bids, is not in the best interests of the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.   Note: This text was suspended from Jan. 1, 1985, until Jan. 1, 1991, during operation of the temporary amendment by Stats. 1984, Ch. 758.)
-------------------------------------------

10122.5.

For the purposes of Section 10122, all day labor utilized by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall be performed by individuals who are represented by a duly authorized employee representative unless individuals with that qualification are not reasonably available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 116, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10122.6.

Notwithstanding the project cost limit provided in Section 10105, work in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) which would otherwise constitute a project, shall not be done by day’s labor unless the requirements of Section 10122 are met.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 615, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.

Contracts upon informal bids authorized under Section 10122 shall be let only to a holder of a valid state contractor’s license unless such work is exempt from such licensing requirement by any other provision of law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10124.

Bids may be received and contracts awarded on a unit basis, that is, the bids compared upon the basis of estimates of the quantities of the work to be done.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10125.

Except in unit basis contracts, contracts shall not be made exceeding in amount the estimates of costs approved by the director and plans and specifications and estimates of costs including expense of advertising and inspection, shall not be approved by the director requiring a greater expenditure of money than is appropriated for the specific purpose in the law authorizing the expenditure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10126.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 10125, the estimate of cost may be approved by the director, which includes alternates contemplating additions to, or deletions from, the base bid, provided that all of the following requirements are met:

(a) Estimates are made for each contingency and, in the aggregate, the alternates do not exceed 10 percent of the estimated cost for the project.

(b) The available funds are at least
 sufficient to cover the filed estimate for the base project.

(c) Whenever additive or deductive items are included in a bid, the bid solicitation shall specify which one of the following methods will be used to determine the lowest bid. In the absence of such a specification, only the method provided by paragraph (1) will be used:

(1) The lowest bid shall be the lowest bid price on the base contract without consideration of the prices on the additive or deductive items.

(2) The lowest bid shall be the lowest total of the bid prices on the base contract and those additive or deductive items that were specifically identified in the bid solicitation as being used for the purpose of determining the lowest bid price.

(3) The lowest bid shall be the lowest
 total of the bid prices on the base contract and those additive or deductive items that, when taken in order from a specifically identified list of those items in the solicitation, and added to, or subtracted from, the base contract, are less than, or equal to, a funding amount publicly disclosed by the department before the first bid is opened.

(4) The lowest bid shall be determined in a manner that prevents any information that would identify any of the bidders or proposed subcontractors or suppliers from being revealed to the public entity before the ranking of all bidders from lowest to highest has been determined.

(d) The contract is awarded to the lowest bidder, as determined by the method prescribed in subdivision (c).

(e) A responsible bidder who submitted the lowest bid as determined by this section shall be
 awarded the contract, if it is awarded. This section does not preclude the department from adding to or deducting from the contract any of the additive or deductive items after the lowest responsible bidder has been determined.

(f) Nothing in this section shall preclude the prequalification of subcontractors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 455, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10127.

The department may, with the approval of the State Public Works Board, receive bids for the construction of several public works projects as a single project. Where more than one appropriation has been made for the several projects united as a single project under the provisions of this section, payments for the single project shall be made from the separate appropriations on the proportional basis that may be determined by the department and approved by the Department of Finance. In the case of several projects united as a single project pursuant to this
 section, those projects shall be within 100 miles of one another.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 857, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10128.

All contracts awarded under this part shall comply with the applicable provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code relating to public works contracts and shall contain all the contract provisions required therein.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10129.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 3400, no agency of the state charged with the letting of contracts for the construction, alteration, or repair of public works may draft or cause to be drafted specifications for bids, in connection with the construction, alteration, or repair of public works, (1) in a manner that limits the bidding, directly or indirectly, to any one specific concern, or (2) calling for a designated material, product, thing, or service by specific brand or trade name unless the specification is followed by the words “or equal” so
 that bidders may furnish any equal material, product, thing, or service. In applying this section, the awarding authority shall, if aware of an equal product manufactured in this state, name that product in the specification. Specifications shall provide a period of time prior to or after, or prior to and after, the award of the contract for submission of data substantiating a request for a substitution of “an equal” item. If no time period is specified, data may be submitted any time within 35 days after the award of the contract.

(b) Subdivision (a) is not applicable if the awarding authority, or its designee, makes a finding that is described in the invitation for bids or request for proposals that a particular material, product, thing, or service is designated by specific brand or trade name for any of the following purposes:

(1) In order that a field test or experiment may be
 made to determine the product’s suitability for future use.

(2) In order to match other products in use on a particular public improvement either completed or in the course of completion.

(3) In order to obtain a necessary item that is only available from one source.

(4) In order to respond to an emergency declared by the state, a state agency, or political subdivision of the state, but only if the facts setting forth the reasons for the finding of the emergency are contained in the public records of the authority issuing the invitation for bid or request for proposals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 233, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Advertisements for Bids [10140. - 10141.]

10140.

(a) Public notice of a project shall be given by publication once a week for at least two consecutive weeks or once a week for more than two consecutive weeks if the longer period of advertising is deemed necessary by the department, as follows:

(1) In a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the project is located, or if located in more than one county, in such a newspaper in a county in which a major portion of the work is to be done.

(2) In a trade paper of general circulation published in San Francisco for projects located in County Group No. 1, as defined in Section 187 of the Streets and Highways Code, or in Los Angeles for projects located in County Group No. 2, as
 defined in Section 187 of the Streets and Highways Code, devoted primarily to the dissemination of contract and building news among contracting and building materials supply firms.

(b) The department may publish the notice to bidders for a project in additional trade papers or newspapers of general circulation that it deems advisable.

(c) (1) In the case of the Department of Transportation, instead of the public notice described in subdivision (a), the public notice requirement of this section may instead be met by publishing the public notice electronically on that department’s Internet Web site.

(2) If the department exercises its authority under paragraph (1), the department shall also publish information regarding notices listed on the department’s Internet Web site in trade papers,
 newspapers, or magazines, as appropriate in order to ensure all communities have access to the public notice, including those publications whose primary audience consists of underrepresented groups, including, but not limited to, women, minorities, LGBT, and disabled veterans, pursuant to the frequency requirements specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 95, Sec. 9.   (SB 103)   Effective July 21, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10141.

The notice shall state the time and place for the receiving and opening of sealed bids, describing in general terms the work to be done and that the bids will be required for the entire project and for the performance of separate designated parts of the entire project, when the department determines that segregation is advisable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Bids and Bidders [10160. - 10169.]

10160.

The department may require from prospective bidders answers to questions contained in a standard form of questionnaire and financial statement including a complete statement of the prospective bidder’s financial ability and experience in performing public works. When completed, the questionnaire and financial statement shall be verified under oath by the bidder in the manner in which pleadings in civil actions are verified.

Whenever prequalification is required of any bidder on a contract, it shall be required for all
 prospective bidders to that contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 471, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10161.

The department may also require from prospective bidders the completion, under penalty of perjury, of a standard form of questionnaire concerning the past safety record of each prospective bidder, any officer of such bidder, and any managing employee of such bidder. The department may refuse to prequalify any prospective bidder who fails to submit a completed questionnaire when required, or for the reason that the information contained in the submitted questionnaire or otherwise known to the department indicates a continuing unsatisfactory safety record.

The director of the department shall prescribe guidelines listing criteria
 which will be utilized administratively in determining an unsatisfactory safety record. A refusal by the department to prequalify a prospective bidder shall be issued only after the department has granted such bidder a hearing.

This section shall in no way abridge or restrict the right of the department to later determine whether the low bidder on a particular project is the lowest responsible bidder for purposes of award of the contract, including the holding of hearings thereon.

The Director of Industrial Relations shall approve the standard form of questionnaire and the guidelines listing criteria which will be utilized administratively by the department in determining an unsatisfactory safety record prior to their use by the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10162.

The department shall require from all prospective bidders the completion, under penalty of perjury, of a standard form of questionnaire inquiring whether such prospective bidder, any officer of such bidder, or any employee of such bidder who has a proprietary interest in such bidder, has ever been disqualified, removed, or otherwise prevented from bidding on, or completing a federal, state, or local government project because of a violation of law or a safety regulation, and if so to explain the circumstances.

A bid may be rejected on the basis of a bidder, any officer of such bidder, or any employee of such bidder who has a
 proprietary interest in such bidder, having been disqualified, removed, or otherwise prevented from bidding on, or completing a federal, state, or local project because of a violation of law or a safety regulation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10163.

The department shall adopt and apply a uniform system of rating bidders, on the basis of the standard questionnaires and financial statements, in respect to the size of the contracts upon which each bidder is qualified to bid. When bids for more than one project are to be received at the same bid opening, the department may permit a bidder to submit bids for each project within such bidder’s prequalification rating, even though such rating is insufficient to permit the bidder to be awarded the contract for each project bid upon.

In no event shall any bidder be awarded a contract if such contract award would result in the bidder
 having under contract work for which prequalification is required in excess of that authorized by his prequalification rating. In determining whether an award of a contract would result in a bidder having under contract work in excess of that authorized by his prequalification rating, the department may use its estimated cost of such contract rather than the amount of the bidder’s bid. If the department determines that a bidder would be awarded the contract for two or more projects but cannot be awarded the contract for all such projects because of the inadequacy of his prequalification rating, the department shall determine which of the bids of such bidder are to be accepted and the contract awarded thereon and which of the bids of such bidder are to be disregarded. In making its decision the department shall be guided by the combination of contract awards which will result in the lowest total cost for the projects involved.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10164.

In all state projects where federal funds are involved, no bid submitted shall be invalidated by the failure of the bidder to be licensed in accordance with the laws of this state. However, at the time the contract is awarded, the contractor shall be properly licensed in accordance with the laws of this state. The contract shall not be awarded unless the state agency has verified that the contractor has a valid license in the appropriate classification for the work performed. Any bidder or contractor not so licensed shall be subject to all legal penalties imposed
 by law, including, but not limited to, any appropriate disciplinary action by the Contractors State License Board. The department shall include a statement to that effect in the standard form of prequalification questionnaire and financial statement. Failure of the bidder to obtain proper and adequate licensing for an award of a contract shall constitute a failure to execute the contract as provided in Section 10181 and shall result in the forfeiture of the security of the bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 432, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

10165.

The questionnaires and financial statements are not public records and are not open to public inspection.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10166.

The department shall furnish to each bidder a standard proposal form, which, when filled out and executed may be submitted as his bid. Bids not presented on forms so furnished shall be disregarded. The department shall not furnish proposal forms to any person who is required to submit and has not submitted a questionnaire and financial statement for prequalification at least five days prior to the date fixed for publicly opening sealed bids and been prequalified for at least one day prior to that date.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10167.

(a) All bids shall be presented under sealed cover and accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(1) An electronic bidder’s bond by an admitted surety insurer submitted using an electronic registry service approved by the department advertising the contract.

(2) A signed bidder’s bond by an admitted surety insurer received by the department advertising the contract.

(3) Cash, a cashier’s check, or certified check received by, and made payable to, the director of the department advertising the contract.

(b) The required bidder’s security shall be in an amount equal to at least 10 percent of the amount bid. A bid shall not be considered unless one of the forms of bidder’s security is enclosed with it.

(c) All bids submitted pursuant to this section shall also comply with the provisions of Section 1601 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 290, Sec. 3.   (AB 1671)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10168.

Whether or not bids are opened exactly at the time fixed in the public notice for opening bids, a bid shall not be received after that time.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10169.

Any bid may be withdrawn at any time prior to the time fixed in the public notice for the opening of bids only by written request for the withdrawal of the bid filed with the director of the department or the chief of the division under which the work is to be performed. The request shall be executed by the bidder or his duly authorized representative. The withdrawal of a bid does not prejudice the right of the bidder to file a new bid.

This section does not authorize the withdrawal of any bid after the time fixed in the public notice for the opening of bids.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Award of Contracts [10180. - 10186.]

10180.

On the day named in the public notice, the department shall publicly open the sealed bids and award the contracts to the lowest responsible bidders.

In the case of bids opened by a district director, pursuant to Section 10141, he shall report the contents thereof to the director. In all other respects, the contracts shall be awarded as are other contracts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10181.

If the successful bidder fails to execute the contract, his bidder’s security shall be forfeited to the state. The cash or proceeds shall be deposited in the fund out of which the expenses of preparation and printing of the plans and specifications, estimates of cost, and publication of notice are paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10182.

If the director deems it is for the best interests of the state, he may, on the refusal or failure of the successful bidder to execute the contract, award it to the second lowest responsible bidder.

If the second lowest responsible bidder fails or refuses to execute the contract, the director may likewise award it to the third lowest responsible bidder. 

On the failure or refusal of the second or third lowest bidder, to whom a contract is so awarded, to execute it, his bidder’s security shall be likewise forfeited to the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10183.

The failure of the successful bidder to furnish any bond required of him by law, within the time fixed for his execution of the contract, constitutes a failure to execute the contract.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10184.

The bidders’ security of the second and third lowest responsible bidders may be withheld until the contract has been finally executed. The cash, cashier’s checks and certified checks submitted by all other unsuccessful bidders shall be returned to them within 10 days after the contract is awarded, and their bidders’ bonds shall be of no further effect.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10185.

If the director deems the acceptance of the lowest responsible bid or bids is not for the best interests of the state, after stating his or her reasons for rejecting the bid or bids, the director may reject all bids and proceed by day’s labor or advertise for other bids in the manner required by this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 410, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10186.

(a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the “Fair Chance Employment Act.”

(b) Any person submitting a bid to the state on a contract involving onsite construction-related services shall certify that the person will not ask an applicant for onsite construction-related employment to disclose orally or in writing information concerning the conviction history of the applicant on or at the time of an initial employment application.

(c) This section shall not apply to a position for which the person or the state is otherwise required by state or federal law to conduct a conviction history background check or to any contract position
 with a criminal justice agency, as that term is defined in Section 13101 of the Penal Code.

(d) This section shall not apply to a person to the extent that he or she obtains workers from a hiring hall pursuant to a bona fide collective bargaining agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 880, Sec. 1.   (AB 1650)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. State Agency Design-Build Projects [10187. - 10195.]

10187.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the design-build method of project delivery, using a best value procurement methodology, has been authorized for various agencies that have reported benefits from such projects including reduced project costs, expedited project completion, and design features that are not achievable through the traditional design-bid-build method.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the following occur:

(1) This article provides general authorization for certain state agencies to use design-build for projects, excluding projects on the state highway system.

(2) This article shall not be deemed to provide a preference for the design-build method over other procurement methodologies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 931, Sec. 6.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10187.5.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions and the definitions in subdivision (a) of Section 13332.19 of the Government Code shall apply:

(a) “Best value” means a value determined by evaluation of objective criteria that relate to price, features, functions, life-cycle costs, experience, and past performance. A best value determination may involve the selection of the lowest cost proposal meeting the interests of the department and meeting the objectives of the project, selection of the best proposal for a stipulated sum established by the procuring agency, or a tradeoff between price and other specified factors.

(b) “Construction subcontract” means each subcontract awarded by the design-build entity to a subcontractor that will perform work or labor or render service to the design-build entity in or about the construction of the work or improvement, or a subcontractor licensed by the State of California that, under subcontract to the design-build entity, specially fabricates and installs a portion of the work or improvement according to detailed drawings contained in the plans and specifications produced by the design-build team.

(c) “Department” means the Department of General Services, the Military Department, and the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(d) “Design-build” means a project delivery process in which both the design and construction of a project are
 procured from a single entity.

(e) “Design-build entity” means a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, or other legal entity that is able to provide appropriately licensed contracting, architectural, and engineering services as needed pursuant to a design-build contract.

(f) “Design-build team” means the design-build entity itself and the individuals and other entities identified by the design-build entity as members of its team. Members shall include the general contractor and, if utilized in the design of the project, all electrical, mechanical, and plumbing contractors.

(g) “Director” means, with respect to procurements undertaken by the Department of General Services, the
 Director of General Services; with respect to procurements undertaken by the Military Department, the Adjutant General; with respect to procurements undertaken by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the secretary of that department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 247, Sec. 2.   (SB 626)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10188.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the director, following notification to the State Public Works Board, may procure design-build contracts for public works projects in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000), awarding the contract using either the low bid or best value, provided that this article shall not apply to any projects on the state highway system.

(b) The director shall develop guidelines for a standard organizational conflict-of-interest policy, consistent with applicable law, regarding the ability of a person or entity, that performs services for the department relating to the solicitation of a design-build project, to submit a proposal as a design-build entity, or to join a design-build
 team. This conflict-of-interest policy shall apply to each department entering into design-build contracts authorized under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 931, Sec. 6.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10190.

The director shall notify the State Public Works Board regarding the method to be used for selecting the design-build entity, prior to advertising the design-build project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 247, Sec. 3.   (SB 626)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10191.

The procurement process for the design-build projects shall progress as follows:

(a) (1) The director shall prepare a set of documents setting forth the scope and estimated price of the project. The documents may include, but need not be limited to, the size, type, and desired design character of the project, performance specifications covering the quality of materials, equipment, workmanship, preliminary plans or building layouts, or any other information deemed necessary to describe adequately the department’s needs. The performance specifications and any plans shall be prepared by a design professional who is duly licensed and registered in California.

(2) The documents shall not include a design-build-operate contract for any project. The documents, however, may include operations during a training or transition period but shall not include long-term operations for any project.

(b) The director shall prepare and issue a request for qualifications in order to prequalify or short-list the design-build entities whose proposals shall be evaluated for final selection. The request for qualifications shall include, but need not be limited to, the following elements:

(1) Identification of the basic scope and needs of the project or contract, the expected cost range, the methodology that will be used by the department to evaluate proposals, the procedure for final
 selection of the design-build entity, and any other information deemed necessary by the director to inform interested parties of the contracting opportunity.

(2) Significant factors that the department reasonably expects to consider in evaluating qualifications, including technical design and construction expertise, and all other nonprice-related factors.
